Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-20] Disclosure of dental care
coverage and benefits. In order to ensure that all individuals understand
their dental care options and are able to make informed decisions, all dental
insurers shall provide current and prospective subscribers with written
disclosure of coverages and benefits, including information on coverage
principles and any exclusions or restrictions on coverage.

The information provided shall be current,
understandable, and available prior to enrollment, and upon request after
enrollment. A policy or contract provided to a subscriber which describes
coverages and benefits shall be in conformance with part I of article 10 of
chapter 431. [L 2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next